Hawaii statutes.
§279A-8 Oahu metropolitan planning
organization; effect on funding. The provisions of this chapter do not
affect the entitlement of the metropolitan planning organization for the island
of Oahu or any other county to unconditionally receive and administer
transportation planning funds pursuant to 23 United States Code section 134, as
amended. [L 1975, c 179, §8; am L 2015, c 132, §2]

Previous
Vol05_Ch0261-0319
Next